District of Columbia statutes.
2-822

Regulations by Council authorized; special registration tags.

(a)

For each inaugural period the Council of the District of Columbia is authorized and directed to make all reasonable regulations necessary to secure the preservation of public order and protection of life, health, and property; to make special regulations respecting the standing, movement, and operation of vehicles of whatever character or kind during such period; and to grant, under such conditions as it may impose, special licenses to peddlers and vendors for the privilege of selling goods, wares, and merchandise in such places in the District of Columbia, and to charge such fees for such privilege, as it may deem proper.

(b)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to issue, for both duly registered motor vehicles and unregistered motor vehicles made available for the use of the Inaugural Committee, special registration tags, valid for a period not exceeding 90 days, designed to celebrate the occasion of the inauguration of the President and Vice President.

History

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1049, ch. 974, § 2
Jan. 30, 1968, 82 Stat. 4, Pub. L. 90-251, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1802.
1973 Ed., § 1-1202.

New Implementing Regulations

New implementing regulations: Pursuant to this section, the following new regulations were adopted in 1982: The “Presidential Inauguration Special Regulations and Rule of Interpretation Concerning Nonrevival of Statutes Act of 1982” (D.C. Law 4-125, July 2, 1982, 29 DCR 2093).

Mayor's Orders

Issuance of 1985 Inaugural License Tags authorized: See Mayor’s Order 84-229, December 15, 1984.

Authorization for Issuance of 2001 Presidential Inaugural License, see Mayor’s Order 2001-05, January 5, 2001 ( 48 DCR 939).

Amendment to Mayor’s Order 2001-5, dated 1-5-01, Authorization for Issuance of 2001 Presidential Inaugural License Plates, see Mayor’s Order 2001-06, January 9, 2001 ( 48 DCR 941).

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(33) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.